Washington statutes.
RCW 43.210.030

Board of directors—Membership—Terms—Vacancies.

The small business export finance assistance center and its branches shall be governed and managed by a board of seven directors appointed by the governor, with the advice of the board, and confirmed by the senate. The directors shall serve terms of four years following the terms of service established by the initial appointments after June 11, 1998. Three appointees, including directors on June 11, 1998, who are reappointed, must serve initial terms of two years and, if a director is reappointed that director may serve a consecutive four-year term. Four appointees, including directors on June 11, 1998, who are reappointed, must serve initial terms of four years and, if a director is reappointed that director may serve a consecutive four-year term. After the initial appointments, directors may serve two consecutive terms. The directors may provide for the payment of their expenses. The directors shall include the director of commerce or the director's designee; representatives of a large financial institution engaged in financing export transactions in the state of Washington; a small financial institution engaged in financing export transactions in the state of Washington; a large exporting company domiciled in the state of Washington; a small exporting company in the state of Washington; organized labor in a trade involved in international commerce; and a representative at large. To the extent possible, appointments to the board shall reflect geographical balance and the diversity of the state population. Any vacancies on the board due to the expiration of a term or for any other reason shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2073; 1998 c 109 s 2; 1995 c 399 s 106; 1991 c 314 s 15; 1985 c 231 s 3; 1983 1st ex.s. c 20 s 3.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Findings—1991 c 314: See note following RCW 43.160.020.